Utah statutes.
41-6a-713.   Driving over gore area or island prohibited -- Exceptions -- Penalties.

(1) (a)  A person may not operate a vehicle over, across, or within any part of a gore area or an island.

(b)  Subsection (1)(a) does not apply to:

(i)  a person operating a vehicle that is disabled; or

(ii)  an operator of an authorized emergency vehicle under conditions described under Section 41-6a-208.

(2)  A person who violates Subsection (1) is guilty of class C misdemeanor.

